Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Human Services from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Two Hundred Seventy-two Thousand
Dollars ($272,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
carry out the provisions of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1847 of the 2nd
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature.

SECTION 2. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Seven Million Seven
Hundred Twenty-nine Thousand One Hundred Ninety-seven Dollars
($7,729,197.00) shall be used to replace funding no longer available
due to the reduction of federal matching dollars.
SECTION 3. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the Department shall maintain the
funding levels for senior nutrition programs from the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026. The Oklahoma Legislature requires joint
approval from the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate
and the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives before any
senior nutrition sites may be closed due to declining attendance or
increased operational costs during the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027.
SECTION 4. In addition to the funding required in Section 3 of
this act, from the funds appropriated to the Department of Human
Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session of the
60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Two Million Five Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) shall be used to maintain the
permanent second meal per day for the ADvantage Waiver Program.
SECTION 5. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Five Million Dollars
($5,000,000.00) shall be used to carry out the provisions of
Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1806 of the 2nd Session of the 60th
Oklahoma Legislature.
SECTION 6. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Two Hundred Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) shall be used to carry out the
provisions of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1377 of the 2nd Session of
the 60th Oklahoma Legislature.
SECTION 7. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Four Million Five
ENR. S. B. NO. 1163 Page 2

Hundred Sixty Thousand Dollars ($4,560,000.00) shall be used to
carry out the provisions of Enrolled House Bill No. 2778 of the 1st
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature.
SECTION 8. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Twenty-five Million
Five Hundred Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($25,575,000.00) shall be
used to provide additional state funding for the administration of
the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
SECTION 9. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the Department is authorized to
transfer the sum of Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) to the 2-
1-1 Hotline Revolving Fund, created in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1290
of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature.
SECTION 10. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Thirty-eight Million
Nine Hundred Ninety-three Thousand Seven Hundred Sixty-one Dollars
($38,993,761.00) shall be used to provide additional state funding
for the ADvantage waivers.
SECTION 11. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the Department shall maintain the
funding levels for provider rates and service authorizations for the
Community, Homeward Bound, In-Home Supports for Adults, In-Home
Supports for Children, and ADvantage waivers from the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026.
SECTION 12. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature for the support of the
Developmental Disability Services Division, in addition to services
provided in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the agency may
also budget for and expend funds for family and self-advocate
onboarding meetings and services, professional development for case
management and providers, expansion of crisis services, and
enhancements to intake processes for the purpose of ensuring a
ENR. S. B. NO. 1163 Page 3

stronger, more responsive service delivery system for Oklahomans
with developmental disabilities.
SECTION 13. From the funds authorized to be transferred to the
Developmental Disability Services Revolving Fund in Enrolled Senate
Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature,
no funds may be expended for administrative services, targeted case
management, Medicaid match for any ICF/IID services or other non-
Medicaid match services not described in Section 11 of this act.
SECTION 14. From the funds appropriated to the Department of
Human Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177 of the 2nd Session
of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the Department of Human Services
shall transfer Five Million Six Hundred Thousand Dollars
($5,600,000.00) to the credit of the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary
Account established in Section 1-9-103 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma
Statutes, which shall be distributed according to Section 1-9-104 of
Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 15. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Human Services all federal monies received by the state during the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from the Temporary Assistance for
Needy Families Block Grant and the Child Care and Development Block
Grant to meet the provisions of federal law relating to such grants.
SECTION 16. The Director of Human Services may request through
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services the
early transfer by the Oklahoma Tax Commission of tax collections to
the General Revenue Fund for the purpose of early allocation to the
Department of Human Services disbursing funds to alleviate cash flow
problems.
SECTION 17. A. The Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services shall transfer monies appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund to the Department of Human Services disbursing
funds in the amounts and ratios requested by the agency except that
the cumulative amount transferred shall not exceed the cumulative
amount of equal monthly allotments of the appropriations from the
General Revenue Fund.
B. Monies appropriated or collected for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, may be transferred to these disbursing funds for the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1163 Page 4

fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to satisfy encumbrances and
obligations of the fiscal year, provided that monies equal in amount
are transferred from appropriations or collections for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, to the disbursing funds for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, to satisfy encumbrances and obligations
of the fiscal year. All transfer requests shall be in writing to
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
C. The Department of Human Services shall maintain records of
such inter-year transfers.
SECTION 18. The Director of Human Services may request the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to
transfer monies between the Department of Human Services Support
Service Providers Grant Program Fund and the Human Services
Disbursing Fund or the Human Services Medical and Assistance Fund,
as needed for the expenditure of funds.
SECTION 19. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 20. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1163 Page 5

Passed the Senate the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1163 Page 6